Washington statutes.
RCW 40.06.010

Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1) "Electronic repository" means a collection of publicly accessible electronic publications stored in a secure digital environment with redundant backup to preserve the collection.

(2) "Format" includes any media used in the publication of state information including electronic, print, audio, visual, and microfilm.

(3) "State agency" includes every state office, officer, department, division, bureau, board, commission and agency of the state, and, where applicable, all subdivisions of each.

(4) "State publication" means information published by state agencies, regardless of format, intended for distribution to state government or the public. Examples may include annual, biennial, and special reports required by law, state agency newsletters, periodicals, and magazines, and other informational material intended for general dissemination to state agencies, the public, or the legislature.

[ 2006 c 199 s 3; 1977 ex.s. c 232 s 8; 1963 c 233 s 1.]

NOTES:

Findings—2006 c 199: See note following RCW 27.04.045.